Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 15A Justice and Public Safety Cabinet

15A.010.
Justice Cabinet established — Secretary. [Repealed.]

15A.011.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cabinet” means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice;

“Department” means the Department of Juvenile Justice;

“Facility” means any facility operating under the authority or control of the Department of Juvenile Justice; and

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 443, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 38, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.015.
Deputy secretaries of justice and public safety.

Deputy secretaries of justice and public safety shall be appointed by and directly responsible to the secretary and shall be the principal assistants and advisors to the secretary for all policies, programs and operations of the cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 155, § 17, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 343, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 39, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.020.
Organization of Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall have the following departments:

Department of Corrections;

Department of Criminal Justice Training, which shall have the following divisions:

Training Operations Division; and

Administrative Division;

Department of Juvenile Justice, which shall have the following offices:

Office of Program Operations, which shall have the following divisions:

Division of Western Region;

Division of Eastern Region; and

Division of Placement Services;

Office of Support Services, which shall have the following divisions:

Division of Administrative Services;

Division of Program Services; and

Division of Medical Services; and

Office of Community and Mental Health Services, which shall have the following divisions:

Division of Professional Development; and

Division of Community and Mental Health Services;

Department of Kentucky State Police, which shall have the following offices and divisions:

Office of Administrative Services, which shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the commissioner;

Division of Operational Support, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Administrative Services; and

Division of Management Services, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Administrative Services;

Office of Operations, which shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the commissioner;

Division of West Troops, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Operations;

Division of East Troops, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Operations;

Division of Special Enforcement, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Operations; and

Division of Commercial Vehicle Enforcement, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Operations; and

Office of Technical Services, which shall be headed by an executive director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the commissioner;

Division of Forensic Services, which shall be headed by a director who shall have a minimum of a bachelor’s degree in a natural science and at least seven (7) years of experience in an accredited forensic laboratory, who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police, and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Technical Services; and

Division of Information Technology, which shall be headed by a director who shall be appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police and who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Technical Services; and

Department of Public Advocacy, which shall have the following divisions:

Protection and Advocacy Division;

Division of Law Operations;

Division of Trial Services;

Division of Post-Trial Services; and

Division of Conflict Services.

Each department, except for the Department of Public Advocacy, shall be headed by a commissioner who shall be appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet with the approval of the Governor as required by KRS

12.040

. Each commissioner shall be directly responsible to the secretary and shall have such functions, powers, and duties as provided by law and as the secretary may prescribe. The Department of Public Advocacy shall be headed by the public advocate, appointed as required by KRS

31.020

, who shall be directly responsible to the Public Advocacy Commission. The Department of Public Advocacy is an independent state agency which shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for administrative purposes only. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall not have control over the Department of Public Advocacy’s information technology equipment and use unless granted access by court order.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall have the following offices and divisions:

Office of the Secretary, which shall be headed by a deputy secretary appointed pursuant to KRS

12.050

and responsible for the direct administrative support for the secretary and other duties as assigned by the secretary, and which, with the approval of the secretary, may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Office of Human Resource Management, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS

12.050

who shall be responsible to and report to the secretary and be responsible for all matters relating to human resources, and who, with the approval of the secretary, may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Division of Human Resource Administration, which shall be headed by a director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Human Resource Management; and

Division of Employee Management, which shall be headed by a director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Human Resource Management;

Office of Legal Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 and

12.210

, that:

Shall provide legal representation and services for the cabinet; and

May investigate all complaints regarding the facilities, staff, treatment of juveniles, and other matters relating to the operation of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. If it appears that there is a violation of statutes, administrative regulations, policies, court decisions, the rights of juveniles who are subject to the orders of the department, or any other matter relating to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the office shall report to the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet who shall, if required, refer the matter to a law enforcement agency, Commonwealth’s attorney, county attorney, the Attorney General, or federal agencies, as appropriate. The office may be used to investigate matters in which there is a suspicion of violation of written policy, administrative regulation, or statutory law within the Department of Public Advocacy only when the investigation will have no prejudicial impact upon a person who has an existing attorney-client relationship with the Department of Public Advocacy. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subparagraph, investigation and discipline of KRS Chapter 16 personnel shall continue to be conducted by the Department of Kentucky State Police pursuant to KRS Chapter 16. The office shall conduct no other investigations under the authority granted in this subparagraph. The secretary may, by administrative order, assign the investigative functions in this subparagraph to a branch within the office.

The executive director shall be directly responsible to and report to the secretary and, with the approval of the secretary, may employ such attorneys appointed pursuant to KRS

12.210

and other staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible for all matters relating to the provision of support to the Criminal Justice Council, legislative liaison services, and functions and duties vested in the Criminal Justice Council as described in KRS

15A.030

. The executive director shall be directly responsible to and report to the secretary and may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Office of Communications, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible to report to the secretary and be responsible for all matters relating to communications, and who, with the approval of the secretary, may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Information and Technology Services Division, which shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Communications;

Office of Financial Management Services, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible to report to the secretary and be responsible for all matters relating to fiscal functions, and who, with the approval of the secretary, may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Division of Financial Management, which shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall report to the executive director of the Office of Financial Management Services;

Grants Management Division, which shall be headed by a director appointed by the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible to report to the secretary and be responsible for all matters relating to state and federal grants management, and who, with the approval of the secretary, may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office;

Office of the Kentucky State Medical Examiner, which shall be headed by a chief medical examiner appointed pursuant to KRS

72.240

who shall be responsible for all matters relating to forensic pathology and forensic toxicology and other duties as assigned by the secretary. The executive director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 shall be responsible for all matters related to the administrative support of the Office of the State Medical Examiner. The executive director shall report directly to the secretary and with the approval of the secretary may employ such administrative support staff as necessary to perform the administrative duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office. The chief medical examiner shall be directly responsible to and report to the secretary and may employ such staff as necessary to perform the forensic duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office; and

Office of Drug Control Policy, which shall be headed by an executive director appointed pursuant to KRS 12.050 who shall be responsible for all matters relating to the research, coordination, and execution of drug control policy and for the management of state and federal grants, including but not limited to the prevention and treatment related to substance abuse. By December 31 of each year, the Office of Drug Control Policy shall review, approve, and coordinate all current projects of any substance abuse program which is conducted by or receives funding through agencies of the executive branch. This oversight shall extend to all substance abuse programs which are principally related to the prevention or treatment, or otherwise targeted at the reduction, of substance abuse in the Commonwealth. The Office of Drug Control Policy shall promulgate administrative regulations consistent with enforcing this oversight authority. The executive director shall be directly responsible to and report to the secretary and may employ such staff as necessary to perform the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 2; 1982, ch. 343, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 64, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 227, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 2001, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2007, ch. 85, § 40, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 15, § 2, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 75, § 12, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 151, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 72, § 10, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 192, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 82, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/26/2007). Although 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 40, contains references to the “Department of Public Advocacy,” the entity created by 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, secs. 7 and 40, and Executive Order 2006-805 is the “Department for Public Advocacy.” In accordance with 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 335, and KRS

7.136

, the erroneous references in this section have been corrected in codification.

(6/26/2007). Although subsection (3)(d) of this section states that the Criminal Justice Council is “described in KRS

15A.030

,” the Criminal Justice Council is actually created and described in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 37, codified as KRS

15A.075

.

15A.030.
Additional organizational units in cabinet.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, in addition to the departments, divisions, offices, and branches set forth in KRS

15A.020

, shall consist of the following organizational units:

Kentucky State Corrections Commission, supported by the Department of Corrections;

Criminal Justice Council, supported by the Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services; and

Kentucky Parole Board, supported by the cabinet.

Except for the Kentucky Parole Board, which shall be attached to the cabinet for administrative and support services only, each agency specified in this section shall:

Perform its duties as specified by law;

Except as otherwise provided by law, be under the general direction and control of the secretary;

Perform such other duties as may be assigned to the secretary; and

Report to the secretary.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 3; 1978, ch. 155, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 343, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 377, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 227, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 65, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 49, § 1, effective March 3, 2000; 2000, ch. 218, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 41, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 38, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

15A.040.
Office of the Secretary — Duties.

The Office of the Secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall advise and recommend to the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Governor, and the General Assembly policies and direction for long-range planning regarding all elements of the criminal justice system. The office shall also:

Award state and federal grants and ensure that the grants are consistent with the priorities adopted by the Governor;

Disseminate information on criminal justice issues and crime trends; and

Provide technical assistance to all criminal justice agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 5; 1998, ch. 606, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 218, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 220, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 534, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 40, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 42, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.042.
Office of Criminal Justice Council — Divisions — Duties — Executive director. [Repealed.]

15A.050.
General counsel. [Repealed.]

15A.060.
Office of Secretary to serve as state planning agency for federal Crime Control and Safe Streets Act.

The Office of Secretary of Justice and Public Safety shall serve as the state planning agency for purposes of compliance with the federal Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968, as amended, or subsequently adopted federal criminal justice legislation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 7; 1978, ch. 155, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 343, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 2000, ch. 218, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 43, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.061.
Interdepartmental collaboration for analysis of juvenile recidivism.

The cabinet shall ensure that all departments within the cabinet collaborate to develop procedures to allow collection and sharing of data necessary to analyze juvenile recidivism. Recidivism includes an adjudication of delinquency by a juvenile court, or a conviction by a District Court or Circuit Court, for an offense committed within three (3) years of release from the custody or control of the Department of Juvenile Justice.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

15A.062.
Fiscal incentive program for local efforts to enhance public safety and reduce juvenile justice system costs.

It is the intent of the Commonwealth to maintain public safety and achieve savings through the use of evidence-based treatment programs and practices at the local level and to reinvest a portion of the savings achieved into community-based programs and services.

The cabinet shall, as funds become available, develop a fiscal incentive program to fund local efforts that enhance public safety while reducing juvenile justice system costs.

Funds appropriated to the cabinet for the fiscal incentive program shall be distributed as follows:

Ninety percent (90%) shall be utilized for renewable, competitive grants to be awarded to judicial districts, or groups of judicial districts, for the purpose of establishing community-based sanction and treatment programs that provide alternatives to out-of-home placement; and

Ten percent (10%) shall be made available to judicial districts, or groups of judicial districts, not receiving funds under paragraph (a) of this subsection, to fund individualized interventions on an occasional basis to avoid commitment to the Department of Juvenile Justice for a limited number of youth.

The cabinet shall establish the incentive grant application and award process for funds allocated under subsection (3)(a) of this section that includes but is not limited to:

The requirements for the grant application, including:

The identification of the local committee that will be responsible for the grant application and implementation. The committee shall consist of local individuals or organizations, which may include judges, county attorneys, defense attorneys, educators, treatment providers, mental health or behavioral health service providers, local officials, law enforcement, and other interested persons. The local committee may utilize an existing committee or may be formed for the purpose of the grant application and implementation;

A requirement that the application be signed as “Have Reviewed and Agree” by all juvenile court judges in the applicant’s judicial district or group of judicial districts;

A description of the proposed program region and the juvenile justice need the program is intended to meet;

A description of how the proposed program collaborates with:

Schools;

The Administrative Office of the Courts;

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

Private entities serving children and families; and

The department; and

A description of performance measures to be utilized to measure the outcome and overall impact of the program;

The procedure for review of the grant applications and the award of the grants including:

A committee that includes subject matter experts to review the applications;

Criteria to be utilized in awarding of the grants, including but not limited to:

The use of evidence-based practices in program design;

How the program reduces the use of commitments;

How the program reduces the use of out-of-home placements;

How the program reduces recidivism;

How the program establishes or utilizes educational, vocational, substance abuse, behavioral health, mental health, or family intervention services, and local alternatives to detention;

Whether grant funds will be used to leverage existing funding resources or increase access to existing resources;

Geographical distribution;

The number of youth potentially served by the program or service;

The cost of the program or service; and

The existence of similar services in the judicial district; and

A process for awarding the grants that may include objective scoring criteria;

A baseline for calculating reductions for the competitive grant program utilizing 2013 data that combines commitment and detention admissions, and overrides of decisions to allow eligible cases to proceed to diversion; and

Criteria for renewal of a grant awarded under subsection (3)(a) of this section, including:

A twenty percent (20%) reduction in detention admissions, public offense commitment, or combination thereof, as compared to the applicant’s baseline; or

A ten percent (10%) reduction in detention admissions, public offense commitments, or combination thereof and a thirty percent (30%) reduction in the use of prosecutorial override of diversion recommendations as compared to the applicant’s baseline;

If the judicial district meets the reductions required in this subsection, the judicial district may be considered for grant renewal. The grants are not guaranteed to be renewed, and an application shall be submitted for consideration of renewal;

If a judicial district has substantially complied with the requirements of the program, but has not attained the reductions required in this subsection, the judicial district may apply for a grant renewal if there is a fifteen percent (15%) reduction in detention admissions, public offense commitments, or a combination thereof during year one (1) as compared to the applicant’s baseline; and

Detention and public offense commitments for violent offenses as specified in KRS

439.3401

shall not be counted in the calculation of reductions for a judicial district.

A judicial district may apply for the competitive grant program under subsection (3)(a) of this section until:

The population of detention admissions and public offense commitments is reduced by sixty percent (60%) as compared to the applicant’s baseline; or

The population of detention admissions, public offense commitments, or a combination thereof is reduced by thirty percent (30%) as compared to the applicant’s baseline, and the use of prosecutorial override of diversion recommendations is reduced by ninety percent (90%) as compared to the applicant’s baseline.

If the judicial district meets the reductions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the district may continue to apply for funding so long as the reductions required are maintained.

The cabinet shall establish an expedited application and approval process for awarding the one (1) time only funds under subsection (3)(b) of this section, that includes but is not limited to:

A requirement that the application be signed as “Have Reviewed and Agree” by a juvenile court judge in the applicant’s judicial district or group of judicial districts;

A description of the proposed purpose of the grant and the applicant’s need; and

Other requirements as determined appropriate by the cabinet.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall:

Act as the fiscal agent to receive funds awarded to a judicial district;

Provide technical assistance to the judicial district in developing and writing its grant application; and

Collect and report data the judicial districts are required to report under the fiscal incentive program.

The cabinet shall report annually to the oversight council created in KRS

15A.063

on the fiscal incentive program, outcomes achieved, and cost savings realized through reductions in the use of detention and commitments.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

15A.063.
Juvenile Justice Oversight Council — Purpose — Membership — Duties.

The Juvenile Justice Oversight Council is created for the purpose of providing independent review of the state juvenile justice system and providing recommendations to the General Assembly. The council is to actively engage in the implementation of the juvenile justice reforms in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 132, collect and review performance measurement data, and continue to review the juvenile justice system for changes that improve public safety, hold youth accountable, provide better outcomes for children and families, and control juvenile justice costs.

The membership of the council shall include the following:

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, ex officio;

The commissioner of the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, ex officio;

The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services, ex officio;

The commissioner of the Department of Juvenile Justice, ex officio;

The commissioner of the Department of Education, ex officio;

The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, ex officio;

The Public Advocate, ex officio;

The Senate chair of the Committee on Judiciary, nonvoting ex officio;

The House chair of the Committee on Judiciary, nonvoting ex officio; and

Five (5) at-large members appointed by the Governor, as follows:

One (1) member representing public schools or an education group or organization;

One (1) District Judge nominated by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme Court;

One (1) member representing law enforcement;

One (1) member of the County Attorneys’ Association nominated by the Attorney General; and

One (1) member representing community-based organizations, whether for-profit or nonprofit, with experience in programs for juveniles, including substance abuse prevention and treatment, case management, mental health, or counseling.

The chairs of the House and Senate Judiciary Committees shall serve as co-chairs.

At-large members shall be appointed by August 1, 2022, shall serve a term of two (2) years, and may be reappointed.

Each ex officio member, except for legislative members, may designate a proxy by written notice to the council prior to call of order of each meeting, and the proxy shall be entitled to participate as a full voting member.

Except as otherwise provided by law, members shall not be compensated for being members of the council but shall be reimbursed for ordinary travel expenses, including meals and lodging, incurred while performing council business.

The council shall meet at least quarterly. A quorum, consisting of a majority of the membership of the council, shall be required for the transaction of business. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chair, or upon the written request of two (2) members to the chair.

The council shall:

Oversee the implementation of the reforms contained in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 132, including:

Review of the performance measures to be adopted and recommend modifications;

Ensure all policies are implemented in accordance with the time frames established;

Ensure the fiscal incentive program established pursuant to KRS

15A.062

is implemented and continue to review the program; and

Review the Department of Juvenile Justice facilities plan submitted following a reduction of population and make recommendations to the General Assembly as to the plan and any changes to the reinvestment of savings achieved from the closure of any facilities;

Collect and review performance data and recommend any additional performance measures needed to identify outcomes in the juvenile justice system;

Review the information received from the Department of Education pursuant to KRS

156.095

, and determine whether any action is necessary, including additional performance measures, funding, or legislation;

Continue review of juvenile justice areas determined appropriate by the council, including:

Status offense reform;

Necessary training for school resource officers as defined in KRS

158.441

, in juvenile justice best practices, research, and impacts on recidivism and long-term outcomes;

Graduated sanctions protocols in public schools, including their current use and their development statewide;

A minimum age of criminal responsibility;

Competency;

Reforms to the family resource and youth service centers in the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

Population levels in Department of Juvenile Justice facilities, and the potential for closure of facilities while maintaining staffing ratios necessary to comply with applicable accreditation standards; and

Whether juvenile court hearings should be open to the public; and

Report by November 2014, and by November of each year thereafter, to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary and the Governor and make recommendations to the General Assembly for any additional legislative changes the council determines appropriate.

The council shall be attached to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The council shall terminate on July 1, 2030, unless the General Assembly extends the term of the council.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 132, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 5, § 11, effective March 11, 2019; 2022 ch. 136, § 1, effective April 8, 2022.